Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.090

Bond—Cash deposit—Action on bond or deposit—Procedure—Judgment.

(1) Before conducting any business as an employment agency each licensee shall file with the director a surety bond in the sum of two thousand dollars running to the state of Washington, for the benefit of any person injured or damaged as a result of any violation by the licensee or his or her agent of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule or regulation adopted by the director pursuant to RCW 19.31.070(1).

(2) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the license applicant may file with the director a cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable to the director: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, If the license applicant has filed a cash deposit, the director shall deposit such funds with the state treasurer. If the license applicant has deposited cash or other negotiable security with the director, the same shall be returned to the licensee at the expiration of one year after the employment agency's license has expired or been revoked, if no legal action has been instituted against the licensee or the surety deposit at the expiration of the year.

(3) Any person having a claim against an employment agency for any violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder may bring suit upon such bond or deposit in an appropriate court of the county where the office of the employment agency is located or of any county in which jurisdiction of the employment agency may be had. Action upon such bond or deposit shall be commenced by serving and filing of the complaint within one year from the date of expiration of the employment agency license in force at the time the act for which the suit is brought occurred. A copy of the complaint shall be served by registered or certified mail upon the director at the time the suit is started, and the director shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits so commenced. Such service on the director shall constitute service on the surety and the director shall transmit the complaint or a copy thereof to the surety within five business days after it shall have been received. The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond, but in case claims pending at any one time exceed the amount of the bond, claims shall be satisfied in the order of judgment rendered. In the event that any final judgment shall impair the liability of the surety upon bond so furnished or the amount of the deposit so that there shall not be in effect a bond undertaking or deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the director shall suspend the license of such employment agency until the bond undertaking or deposit in the required amount, unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims, shall have been furnished.

(4) In the event of a final judgment being entered against the deposit or security referred to in subsection (2) of this section, the director shall, upon receipt of a certified copy of the final judgment, order said judgment to be paid from the amount of the deposit or security.

[ 2011 c 336 s 533; 1977 ex.s. c 51 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 9.]